morpho/german.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Masc +Fem +Neut +Sing +Plur +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc
    +V +Infinitive +Present +Prateritum +Perfektum +Imperative +1P +2P +3P

LEXICON Root
Noun ;
Verb ;

LEXICON Verb
kaufen:_kauf Vinf;
einkaufen:ein_kauf Vinf;

LEXICON Vinf
+V+Infinitive:en^_null #;

+V+Present+Sing+1P:^e     #;
+V+Present+Sing+2P:^st    #;
+V+Present+Sing+3P:^t     #;
+V+Present+Plur+1P:^en    #;
+V+Present+Plur+2P:^t     #;
+V+Present+Plur+3P:^en    #;

+V+Prateritum+Sing+1P:^te   #;
+V+Prateritum+Sing+2P:^test #;
+V+Prateritum+Sing+3P:^te   #;
+V+Prateritum+Plur+1P:^ten  #;
+V+Prateritum+Plur+2P:^tet  #;
+V+Prateritum+Plur+3P:^ten  #;

+V+Imperative+Sing+2P:^0   #;
+V+Imperative+Plur+1P:^en  #;
+V+Imperative+Plur+2P:^t   #;
+V+Imperative+Plur+3P:^en  #;

+V+Perfektum:^t^_ge  #;

LEXICON Noun

Staat NMstaat;
Direktor NMstaat;
Dämon NMstaat;
Indikator NMstaat;

Fahrer NMfahrer;
Ableger NMfahrer;
Akademiker NMfahrer;
Araber NMfahrer;

Lehrling NMlehrling;
Aspekt NMlehrling;
Berg NMlehrling;
Brief NMlehrling;

Student NMstudent;
Adressat NMstudent;
Anarchist NMstudent;
Astronaut NMstudent;

Name NMname;

Mutter NFmutter;

Meinung NFmeinung;
Elf NFmeinung;
Emission NFmeinung;
Emotion NFmeinung;

Kraft NFkraft;
Bank NFkraft;
Hand NFkraft;
Großstädt NFkraft;

Kamera NFkamera;
Jean NFkamera;
Opera NFkamera;

Bild NNbild;
Brett NNbild;

Radio NNradio;
Büro NNradio;
Foto NNradio;


LEXICON NMstaat
+N+Masc+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Gen:^s    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Nom:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Acc:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Dat:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Gen:^en   #;

LEXICON NMfahrer
+N+Masc+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Gen:^s    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Nom:0     #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Acc:0     #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Dat:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Gen:0     #;

LEXICON NMlehrling
+N+Masc+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Gen:^s    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Nom:^e    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Acc:^e    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Dat:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Gen:^e    #;

LEXICON NMstudent
+N+Masc+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Acc:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Dat:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Gen:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Nom:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Acc:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Dat:^en   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Gen:^en   #;

LEXICON NMname
+N+Masc+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Acc:^n    #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Dat:^n    #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Gen:^ns   #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Nom:^n    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Acc:^n    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Dat:^n    #;
+N+Masc+Plur+Gen:^n    #;

LEXICON NFmutter
+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:0     #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Nom:^¨    #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Acc:^¨    #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Dat:^¨n   #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Gen:^¨    #;

LEXICON NFmeinung
+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:0     #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Nom:^en   #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Acc:^en   #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Dat:^en   #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Gen:^en   #;

LEXICON NFkraft
+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:0     #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Nom:^¨e   #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Acc:^¨e   #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Dat:^¨en  #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Gen:^¨e   #;

LEXICON NFkamera
+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:0     #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Nom:^s    #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Acc:^s    #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Dat:^s    #;
+N+Fem+Plur+Gen:^s    #;

LEXICON NNbild
+N+Neut+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Gen:^s    #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Nom:^er   #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Acc:^er   #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Dat:^ern  #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Gen:^er   #;

LEXICON NNradio
+N+Neut+Sing+Nom:0     #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Acc:0     #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Dat:0     #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Gen:^s    #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Nom:^s    #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Acc:^s    #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Dat:^s    #;
+N+Neut+Plur+Gen:^s    #;
